Wisconsin, session 2025, SB18.
do enact as follows:SB18,11Section 1. 115.385 (1) (b) of the statutes is renumbered 115.385 (1) (b) 1m., 2and 115.385 (1) (b) 1m. (intro.), as renumbered, is amended to read:SB18,2,63115.385 (1) (b) 1m. (intro.) An Subject to subd. 2m., an index system to 4identify a school’s level of performance and a school district’s level of improvement 5and to annually assign to each school and school district one of the following 6performance categories:SB18,27Section 2. 115.385 (1) (b) 2m. of the statutes is created to read:SB18,2,138115.385 (1) (b) 2m. For the school and school district accountability reports 9published for the school year beginning on the July 1 immediately preceding the 10effective date of this subdivision .... [LRB inserts date], and for each school year 11thereafter, the department shall use the same cut scores and the same score ranges 12for the performance categories under subd. 1m. that the department used for the 13report published under this section in the 2019-20 school year.SB18,314Section 3. 115.385 (1) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB18,3,31115.385 (1) (c) A qualitative definition for For each of the 5 performance 2categories in par. (b) 1m., the same qualitative definition that the department used 3for the report published under this section in the 2019-20 school year.SB18,44Section 4. 118.30 (1j) of the statutes is created to read:SB18,3,85118.30 (1j) For examinations administered under this section or 20 USC 6311 6(b) (2) in the school year beginning on the July 1 immediately preceding the effective 7date of this subsection .... [LRB inserts date], and in each school year thereafter, the 8department shall do all of the following:SB18,3,139(a) For examinations in English language arts and mathematics administered 10to pupils in grades 3 to 8, use cut scores, score ranges, and pupil performance 11categories that are aligned to the cut scores, score ranges, and pupil performance 12categories set by the National Assessment of Educational Progress for the same 13subject and the same grade.SB18,3,1814(b) For examinations in English, reading, and mathematics administered to 15pupils in grades 9 to 11, use the same cut scores, the same score ranges, and the 16same pupil performance categories that the department used to evaluate the same 17examinations administered in the 2021-22 school year, including the following 18terminology for the pupil performance categories:SB18,3,19191. Below Basic.SB18,3,20202. Basic.SB18,3,21213. Proficient.SB18,3,22224. Advanced.SB18,3,2323